North Carolina statutes. Chapter 103. Sundays, Holidays and Special Days.
§ 103-1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1951, c. 73.

§ 103-2.
Method of take when hunting on Sunday.

Any landowner or member of the landowner’s family, or any person with written permission from the landowner, may, subject to rules established by the Wildlife Resources Commission, hunt wild animals and upland game birds with the use of firearms on Sunday on the landowner’s property, except that all of the following limitations apply:

Hunting on Sunday between 9:30 A.M. and 12:30 P.M. is prohibited, except on controlled hunting preserves licensed pursuant to G.S. 113-273(g).

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-182, s. 1, effective July 25, 2017.

The use of a firearm to take deer that are run or chased by dogs on Sunday is prohibited.

Hunting on Sunday within 500 yards of a place of religious worship, as defined by

G.S. 14-54.1(b)

, or any accessory structure thereof, is prohibited.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-182, s. 1, effective July 25, 2017.

(a1)

Any person may, subject to rules established by the Wildlife Resources Commission, hunt wild animals and upland game birds with the use of firearms on Sunday on public lands of the State managed for hunting, except that the following limitations apply:

(1)

Hunting on Sunday between 9:30 A.M. and 12:30 P.M. is prohibited.

(2)

The use of a firearm to take deer that are run or chased by dogs on Sunday is prohibited.

(3)

Hunting on Sunday within 500 yards of a place of religious worship, as defined by

G.S. 14-54.1(b)

, or any accessory structure thereof, is prohibited.

(a2)

The hunting of migratory birds on Sunday is prohibited unless authorized by proclamation or rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission, subject to the following limitations:

(1)

Hunting on Sunday between 9:30A.M. and 12:30 P.M. is prohibited, except on controlled hunting preserves licensed pursuant to G.S. 113-273(g).

(2)

Hunting on Sunday within 500 yards of a place of religious worship, as defined by G.S. 14-54.1(b), or any accessory structure thereof, is prohibited.

(3)

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall not authorize hunting of migratory birds on Sunday prior to March 1, 2018.

A person who hunts on Sunday in a manner prohibited under this section or rules adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Provided, that the provisions of this section are not applicable to military reservations, the jurisdiction of which is exclusively in the federal government, to field trials authorized by the Wildlife Resources Commission, or to actions taken in defense of a person’s property. Wildlife protectors are granted authority to enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

1868-9, c. 18, ss. 1, 2; Code, s. 3783; Rev., s. 3842; C.S., s. 3956; 1945, c. 1047; 1967, c. 1003; 1979, c. 830, s. 13; 1989, c. 642, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 684; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2015-144, s. 5(a); 2017-182, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Perquimans: 1935, c. 145.

§ 103-3.
Execution of process on Sunday.

It shall be lawful for any sheriff or other lawful officer to execute any summons, capias, or other process on Sunday.

History.

1957, c. 1052; 1973, c. 108, s. 47.

§ 103-4.
Dates of public holidays.

The following are declared to be legal public holidays:

New Year’s Day, January 1.

(1a)

Martin Luther King, Jr.’s, Birthday, the third Monday in January.

Robert E. Lee’s Birthday, January 19.

Washington’s Birthday, the third Monday in February.

(3a)

Greek Independence Day, March 25.

Anniversary of signing of Halifax Resolves, April 12.

Confederate Memorial Day, May 10.

Anniversary of Mecklenburg Declaration of Independence, May 20.

Memorial Day, the last Monday in May.

Good Friday.

Independence Day, July 4.

Labor Day, the first Monday in September.

(10a)

First Responders Day, September 11.

Columbus Day, the second Monday in October.

(11a)

Yom Kippur.

Veterans Day, November 11.

Tuesday after the first Monday in November in years in which a general election is to be held.

Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November.

Christmas Day, December 25.

Whenever any public holiday shall fall upon Sunday, the Monday following shall be a public holiday.

History.

1881, c. 294; Code, s. 3784; 1891, c. 58; 1899, c. 410; 1901, c. 25; Rev., s. 2838; 1907, c. 996; 1909, c. 888; 1919, c. 287; C.S., s. 2959; 1935, c. 212; 1959, c. 1011; 1969, c. 521; 1973, c. 53; 1979, c. 84; 1981, c. 135; 1983, c. 1; 1987, c. 25, s. 1; c. 851, ss. 1, 2; c. 853, s. 2; 2017-57, s. 16B.6.

§ 103-5.
Acts to be done on Sunday or holidays.

Except as otherwise provided by law, when the day or the last day for doing any act required or permitted by law to be performed in a public office or courthouse falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday when the public office or courthouse is closed for transactions, the act may be performed on the next day that the public office or courthouse is open for transactions.

This section does not apply where the act required or permitted by law to be done is prescribed by Section 22 of Article II, or Section 5(11) of Article III, of the Constitution of North Carolina.

History.

Code, ss. 3784, 3785, 3786; 1899, c. 733, s. 194; Rev., s. 2839; C.S., s. 3960; 1951, c. 1176, s. 1; 1995, c. 20, s. 16; 2003-337, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to computing time when last day falls on Sunday, see

G.S. 1-593

and

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 6(a).

As to closing county clerk’s office on Easter Monday, see note to

G.S. 103-4

.

§ 103-6.
Arbor Week.

The week in March of each year containing March 15 is hereby designated as Arbor Week in North Carolina.

History.

1967, c. 39.

§ 103-7.
American Family Day.

The first Sunday in August of each year is designated as American Family Day in North Carolina.

History.

1979, c. 457.

§ 103-8.
Indian solidarity week.

The last full week in September of each year is designated as Indian solidarity week in North Carolina.

History.

1981, c. 769.

§ 103-9.
Prisoner of War Day.

The ninth of April of each year is designated as Prisoner of War Recognition Day.

History.

1989, c. 428, s. 1.

§ 103-10.
Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day.

The seventh of December of each year is designated as Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day in North Carolina.

History.

1991, c. 175, s. 1.

§ 103-11.
Disability History and Awareness Month.

The month of October of each year is designated as Disability History and Awareness Month in North Carolina.

History.

2007-274, s. 1.

§ 103-12.
Organ Donation Awareness/Donate Life Month.

The month of April of each year is designated as Organ Donation Awareness/Donate Life Month in North Carolina.

History.

2013-22, s. 1.

§ 103-13.
Fragile X Awareness Day.

The twenty-second of July of each year is designated as North Carolina Fragile X Awareness Day.

History.

2013-238, s. 1.

§ 103-14.
Lineman Appreciation Day.

The second Monday in April of each year is designated as Lineman Appreciation Day in North Carolina.

History.

2015-8, s. 2.

§ 103-15.
Posttraumatic stress injury awareness.

June 27 of each year is designated as Posttraumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day in North Carolina.

History.

2019-225, s. 1.

§ 103-16.
Wounded Heroes Day.

The twenty-fourth day of April of each year is designated as Wounded Heroes Day in North Carolina.

History.

2021-12, s. 1.